Hawaii, session 2026, HB2610.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $36,375,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the thirty-seventh representative district, as follows: 1.   Waiawa correctional facility Design and construction for facility-wide fire sprinkler system improvements and repairs to enhance life safety, ensure compliance with current fire codes, and improve overall system reliability, including all necessary appurtenances. Design                         $150,000 Construction                 $1,350,000 Total funding                     $1,500,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of corrections and rehabilitation. 2.   Waiawa correctional facility Design and construction for critical facility wastewater system improvements to resolve ongoing sewage backups, accommodate increased flow capacity, and install modern monitoring systems to enhance operational efficiency and reliability. Design                         $400,000 Construction                 $3,600,000 Total funding                     $4,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of corrections and rehabilitation. 3.   Waiawa correctional facility Design and construction for facility-wide electrical distribution system repairs and upgrades to improve reliability, address aging infrastructure, and support current and future operational demands. Design                         $150,000 Construction                 $1,350,000 Total funding                     $1,500,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of corrections and rehabilitation. 4.   Waiawa correctional facility Design and construction for facility-wide plumbing system improvements to repair and replace deteriorated piping, address leaks, and improve water efficiency and system reliability. Design                         $120,000 Construction                 $1,080,000 Total funding                     $1,200,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of corrections and rehabilitation. 5.   Waiawa correctional facility Design and construction for the removal and replacement of boilers in inmate housing units for buildings 4, 5, 6, 9, and 10 to address the lack of hot water for showers after work programs and ensure a functional and reliable hot water supply, including all necessary appurtenances. Design                          $40,000 Construction                   $360,000 Total funding                       $400,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of corrections and rehabilitation. 6.   Waiawa correctional facility Design and construction for a farm wash station, agricultural production area, and associated office space to support inmate work programs, food production, and facility self-sufficiency, including all necessary appurtenances. Design                         $180,000 Construction                 $1,620,000 Total funding                     $1,800,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of corrections and rehabilitation. 7.   Waiawa correctional facility Design and construction for the replacement of roofing and gutters at the Kashbox facility to address water intrusion, extend building life, and ensure long-term durability. Design                          $50,000 Construction                   $450,000 Total funding                       $500,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of corrections and rehabilitation. 8.   Waiawa correctional facility Design and construction for the improvement of the facility laundry room to address non-functional dryers, including the installation of commercial-grade washers and dryers, to enhance efficiency and meet the facility's operational needs, along with all necessary appurtenances. Design                          $55,000 Construction                   $495,000 Total funding                       $550,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of corrections and rehabilitation. 9.   Waiawa correctional facility Design and construction for a new visitor center to provide a safe, functional, and welcoming space for family members visiting inmates, replacing the current makeshift facility, a modified shipping container. Design                         $150,000 Construction                 $1,350,000 Total funding                     $1,500,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of corrections and rehabilitation. 10.  Lehua elementary school Design and construction for the expansion and reconfiguration of the student drop-off and pick-up area to address traffic congestion and safety concerns and for perimeter fencing and campus lighting systems to deter unauthorized nighttime access. Design                         $250,000 Construction                 $2,750,000 Total funding                     $3,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 11.  Mililani Mauka elementary school Design and construction to complete exterior campus painting for remaining buildings to ensure facility preservation and uniformity. Design                          $60,000 Construction                   $540,000 Total funding                       $600,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 12.  Mililani Uka elementary school Design and construction for the removal and replacement of outdated kindergarten playground equipment with new structures, resurfacing of the playground area for safety and durability, replacement of a slide, and providing shade structures as necessary to enhance the play environment for students. Design                          $25,000 Construction                   $250,000 Total funding                       $275,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 13.  Kipapa elementary school Design and construction for a covered playcourt to provide a safe, weather-protected space for student assemblies, physical education, recreation, and other school and community activities. Design                         $525,000 Construction                 $2,975,000 Total funding                     $3,500,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 14.  Pearl City high school Plans and construction for the installation of air conditioning systems in career and technical education classrooms to improve instructional conditions, equipment performance, and student safety. Plans                          $300,000 Construction                 $2,200,000 Total funding                     $2,500,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 15.  University of Hawaii West Oahu Construction for a comprehensive campus master facilities maintenance plan to identify deficiencies, prioritize capital needs, and prevent future facilities failures. Construction                 $1,000,000 Total funding                     $1,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the University of Hawaii West Oahu. 16.  University of Hawaii West Oahu Design and construction for the academy for creative media to install electronic locking systems, remote lockdown software, and expanded campus CCTV coverage, particularly near the skyline rail station. Design                         $300,000 Construction                 $1,700,000 Total funding                     $2,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the University of Hawaii West Oahu. 17.  University of Hawaii West Oahu Design and construction for a dedicated veterans success center with study areas, private meeting rooms, and spaces honoring military service. Design                         $300,000 Construction                 $1,700,000 Total funding                     $2,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the University of Hawaii West Oahu. 18.  University of Hawaii West Oahu Design and construction for the identification and repair of leaking campus irrigation systems to reduce excessive annual water costs. Design                         $200,000 Construction                   $800,000 Total funding                     $1,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the University of Hawaii West Oahu. 19.  University of Hawaii West Oahu Design and construction for the improvement of campus landscaping using native and regionally appropriate plants to enhance campus appeal and support enrollment and retention. Design                         $150,000 Construction                   $850,000 Total funding                     $1,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the University of Hawaii West Oahu. 20.  University of Hawaii West Oahu Design and construction for general campus repairs and deferred maintenance, including replacement of remaining fluorescent lighting with energy-efficient LED lighting. Design                         $250,000 Construction                 $1,750,000 Total funding                     $2,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the University of Hawaii West Oahu. 21.  Mililani middle school Design and construction for the widening of the sidewalks near buildings F, G, and H to meet ADA standards, create passing spaces, and accommodate increased pedestrian traffic from the new building J. Design                         $100,000 Construction                   $700,000 Total funding                       $800,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 22.  Mililani public library Plans, design, and construction for major infrastructure and equipment upgrades, efficiency redesign, and the incorporation of future new services, programs, and equipment to meet emerging community needs. Plans                           $50,000 Design                         $100,000 Construction                 $1,000,000 Total funding                     $1,150,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the Hawaii state public library system. 23.  Kuahelani avenue crosswalk Design and construction for student pedestrian and crosswalk safety improvements in the vicinity of Kipapa elementary school along Kuahelani avenue to enhance visibility, reduce vehicle speeds, and improve safety for students, families, and school staff. Design                         $250,000 Construction                 $1,150,000 Total funding                     $1,400,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of transportation. 24.  Traffic safety improvements Plans and construction for pedestrian and traffic safety improvements in the Mililani and Waipio communities to reduce speeding, improve driver awareness, and enhance safety for pedestrians, students, transit riders, and residents, with improvements prioritizing school zones, bus stop areas, and roadway segments with documented speeding and pedestrian safety concerns, including but not limited to Lanikuhana avenue, Kaekae street, Waipio Uka street, and Kuahelani avenue, as well as other locations identified through community input and department of transportation assessments. Plans                          $180,000 Construction                 $1,020,000 Total funding                     $1,200,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of transportation. SECTION 2.  The appropriation made for the capital improvement projects authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________